Idaho, session 2025, H0418.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Division of Career Technical Education
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs
and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SECONDARY AND GENERAL PROGRAMS:
FROM:
Federal Grant
Fund $360,400 $360,400
II. POSTSECONDARY PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $10,000,000 $10,000,000
Federal Grant
Fund 1,682,900 1,682,900
TOTAL $11,682,900 $11,682,900
III. RELATED PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $50,000 $50,000


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund $24,500 205,900 230,400
TOTAL $24,500 $255,900 $280,400
GRAND TOTAL $24,500 $12,299,200 $12,323,700
SECTION 2. USE OF APPROPRIATED FUNDS. Of the moneys appropriated in
Section 1 of this act, $1,666,666 per institution, not to exceed $10,000,000
ongoing from the General Fund, shall be distributed for capacity enhance-
ments to the technical colleges, including College of Eastern Idaho, College
of Southern Idaho, College of Western Idaho, North Idaho College, Idaho
State University, and Lewis-Clark State College. Each technical college
shall submit an interim report to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Commit-
tee by December 31, 2025, and an end-of-fiscal year report by June 30, 2026,
on the expenditure of these funds. The format and content of this report will
be determined in consultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 3. OUTCOMES OF ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY INVESTMENTS. The
Division of Career Technical Education shall submit a report to the Joint
Finance-Appropriations Committee by December 31, 2025, detailing all funds
spent for adult education and literacy in the preceding five fiscal years.
This report shall identify outcomes and return on investment of appropriated
funds. The format and content of this report will be determined in consul-
tation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Ser-
vices Office.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTIONS FROM OBJECT TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. Secondary
and General Programs, Postsecondary Programs, and Related Programs within
the Division of Career Technical Education are hereby exempted from the
provisions of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing transfers between
budgeted programs and for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for federal Perkins Career and Technical
Education funds. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from
one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 5. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.